Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2428
Power projects; agency organization; conflict with certain entities; limitations.

Nothing in sections 18-2401 to 18-2485 shall be construed to prevent the organization of an agency whose participating municipalities operate within, or partly within, the territorial boundaries of a district or corporation organized under the provisions of Chapter 70, article 6, 7, or 8, so long as the plants, systems, and works, the operation of the same, the exercise of powers, and the assumption of duties and responsibilities of, or on the part of, such agency do not nullify, conflict with, or materially affect those of a district or corporation organized under the provisions of Chapter 70, article 6, 7, or 8.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 28.